New Jersey, session 222, A2441.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each month in which students receive transportation services, the school transportation supervisor of a school district shall conduct: a.     A school bus condition inspection on each school bus assigned to the school district pursuant to a contract with a school bus contractor; and b.    A check of the valid drivers license of the school bus driver of that vehicle. The inspection and check shall be conducted on school property. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.